exercise4/arabic_verbs1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
        FORM1 FORM2 FORM3 ACTIVE PASSIVE
        +Verb +Form1 +Form2 +Form3 +Act +Pass +3P +Masc +Fem +Sg

LEXICON Root
        Stems ;

LEXICON Stems
drs:dVrCWs      Patterns ;
ktb:kVtCWb      Patterns ;

LEXICON Patterns
+Verb+Form1:FORM1       VerbVoice ;
+Verb+Form2:FORM2       VerbVoice ;
+Verb+Form3:FORM3       VerbVoice ;

LEXICON VerbVoice
+Act:ACTIVE             VerbPerson ;
+Pass:PASSIVE           VerbPerson ;

LEXICON VerbPerson
+3P+Masc+Sg:a   # ;
+3P+Fem+Sg:at   # ;

END
